Washington statutes.
RCW 23.95.415

Designation of registered agent.

(1) A registered agent filing must be executed by the represented entity and state:

(a) The name of the entity's commercial registered agent; or

(b) If the entity does not have a commercial registered agent:

(i) The name and address of the entity's noncommercial registered agent; or

(ii) The title of an office or other position with the entity, if service of process, notices, and demands are to be sent to whichever individual is holding that office or position, and the address to which process, notices, or demands are to be sent.

(2) A registered agent shall not be appointed without having given prior consent in a record to the appointment. The consent shall be delivered to the secretary of state in such form as the secretary of state may prescribe. The consent shall be filed with or as a part of the record first appointing a registered agent. In the event any individual or entity has been appointed registered agent without consent, that individual or entity may deliver to the secretary of state a notarized statement attesting to that fact, and the name shall immediately be removed from the records of the secretary of state.

[ 2015 c 176 s 1404.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.